Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 18. Probation and Parole Incentives and Sanctions

History.

2019 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 7-13-1801.
Incentives and sanctions system; duties of the department of corrections; definitions.

The department shall by rule and regulation establish, maintain and implement an incentives and sanctions system to utilize as responses to positive and negative behavior by probationers, parolees and conditional releasees under the department’s supervision. The system shall provide for graduated responses to compliance violations and other violations of supervision conditions in a swift, certain and proportional manner and shall include guidance and procedures to determine when and how to:

Request a warrant;

Initiate and conduct any hearing required under W.S.

7-13-1803

; and

Seek departmental approval to use custodial sanctions.

To implement and continuously improve the incentives and sanctions system, the department shall:

Provide information and training on the system to probation and parole agents and supervisors and to members and staff of the state board of parole;

Offer information and training on the system to the Wyoming supreme court, district court judges, circuit court judges, district attorneys, defense attorneys, law enforcement officers, corrections and detention officers, contracted service providers and other interested personnel;

Review the system at least one (1) time every five (5) years to ensure that the system adheres to evidence-based practices and that the use of incentives and sanctions by probation and parole agents is consistent throughout the state;

Ensure that the responses, guidance and procedures established in the system consider community safety and the needs of the victim and offender;

Collect data relating to placement decisions determined by using the system;

Aggregate collected data and submit a report by September 1 of each year to the joint judiciary interim committee.

As used in this article:

“Cognitive-behavioral programming” means programming or therapy that utilize cognitive-behavioral and social learning theories to target a person’s dysfunctional beliefs, thoughts and patterns of behavior that contribute or lead to criminal behaviors;

“Compliance violation” means as defined in W.S. 7-13-401(a)(xv);

“Department” means the department of corrections.

History.

2019 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 8, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 7-13-1802.
Authorized sanctions.

The sanctions authorized under W.S. 7-13-1801(a) may include:

Loss or restriction of privileges;

Community service;

Placement in an intensive supervision program established under W.S.

7-13-1102

or a nonresidential community correctional program established under W.S.

7-18-103

or

7-18-104

;

Custodial sanctions authorized under subsection (b) of this section, subject to any procedure required under W.S.

7-13-1803

and any rules promulgated under W.S. 7-13-1801(a).

Subject to the requirements in W.S. 7-13-1803(c), custodial sanctions authorized by W.S. 7-13-1801(a) for compliance violations shall include one (1) or more of the following:

A sanction of time served in custody between arrest and hearing or between arrest and the disposition of the alleged violation if a hearing is not held;

Immediate confinement in a consenting Wyoming county jail, to be imposed as a two (2) or three (3) day consecutive period;

Confinement in a consenting Wyoming county jail for up to fifteen (15) consecutive days in addition to any time served between arrest and hearing;

Confinement for up to ninety (90) days in a residential community correction program established under W.S.

7-18-103

or

7-18-104

coupled with substance abuse treatment, cognitive-behavioral programming to address criminal thinking or other programming that the department deems appropriate;

Confinement for up to ninety (90) days in a consenting Wyoming county jail coupled with substance abuse treatment contracted with and paid for by the department;

Incarceration in a state penal institution for up to ninety (90) days coupled with substance abuse treatment, cognitive-behavioral programming to address criminal thinking or other programming that the department deems appropriate.

History.

2019 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 8, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 7-13-1803.
Procedure for imposing sanctions; housing violators; civil actions against officials.

A probation and parole agent who reasonably believes that a defendant, probationer, parolee or conditional releasee has committed one (1) or more compliance violations that require a sanction shall utilize sanctions available within the incentives and sanctions system to determine an appropriate response. Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the agent shall initiate a hearing in accordance with subsection (b) of this section and W.S.

7-13-408

and shall attempt to gain the person’s compliance with the conditions of probation, parole or conditional release through the sanctions provided in W.S.

7-13-1802

.

Any hearing under this section shall be before the field services administrator, his designated hearing officer or any other person authorized pursuant to the laws of this state to hear cases of alleged probation, parole or conditional release violations, except that no hearing officer shall be the person making the allegation of violation. If the hearing officer determines by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant, probationer, parolee or conditional releasee has violated a condition of probation, parole or conditional release, the hearing officer shall utilize the incentives and sanctions system to determine an appropriate response, which may include the sanctions authorized under W.S.

7-13-1802

.

Any imposition of custodial sanctions shall be subject to the following conditions:

All time in custody related to the compliance violation shall be credited toward the defendant’s, probationer’s, parolee’s or conditional releasee’s sentence;

The total of all confinement under W.S. 7-13-1802(b)(i) and (ii) shall not exceed eighteen (18) days during the term of probation, parole or conditional release;

Cumulative custodial sanctions imposed under W.S. 7-13-1802(b)(i) through (iii) shall not exceed ninety (90) days during the term of probation, parole or conditional release prior to any revocation.

A hearing shall be held before custodial sanctions are imposed. The imposition of sanctions shall not require a hearing if:

The probationer or parolee is a participant in the intensive supervision program pursuant to W.S.

7-13-1105

;

The probationer is a qualified offender whose probation has been previously revoked pursuant to W.S. 7-13-1303(d); or

The probationer or parolee consents to the administrative sanction without a hearing.

Upon agreement of the sheriff and the director of the department of corrections, the probationer, parolee or conditional releasee may be maintained at the county jail at an agreed per diem rate to be paid by the department. The department shall pay for any medical treatment of the probationer, parolee or conditional releasee, other than for conditions demanding immediate medical attention which can be treated at the county jail for which the county is liable under W.S. 18-6-303(c)(i). Except for emergency medical treatment, no treatment which is the responsibility of the department under this subsection shall be provided without the prior approval of the department.

If any civil action is brought against any sheriff, his undersheriff, deputy, agent or employee, by reason of acts committed or allegedly committed in the performance of necessary duties in connection with the housing and care of a probation, parole or conditional release violator under this section, the state shall indemnify and hold harmless the officers, agents or employees from all civil liability incurred or adjudged except punitive damage awards. Upon request, the state shall provide legal counsel at the state’s expense to assist in the defense of any action referred to in this subsection.

Probationers, parolees and conditional releasees committed to the county jail or a residential community correctional program pursuant to this section shall be housed in accordance with subsection (e) of this section or W.S. 7-18-115(b).

History.

2019 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 8, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.